California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(d) A peace officer of this state or a political subdivision thereof while the peace officer is employed by a private employer to engage in off-duty employment in accordance with Section 1126 of the Government Code. However, nothing herein shall exempt a peace officer who either contracts for the peace officer’s services or the services of others as a private patrol operator or contracts for the peace officer’s services as or is employed as an armed private security officer. For purposes of this subdivision, “armed security officer” means an individual who carries or uses a firearm in the course and scope of that contract or employment.

(e) A retired peace officer of the state or political subdivision thereof when the retired peace officer is employed by a private employer in employment approved by the chief law enforcement officer of the jurisdiction where the employment takes place, provided that the retired officer is in a uniform of a public law enforcement agency, has registered with the bureau on a form approved by the director, and has met any training requirements or their equivalent as established for security personnel under Section 7583.5. This officer may not carry an unloaded and exposed handgun unless the officer is exempted under the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 26361) of Chapter 6 of Division 5 of Title 4 of Part 6 of the Penal Code, may not carry an unloaded firearm that is not a handgun unless the officer is exempted under the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 26405) of Chapter 7 of Division 5 of Title 4 of Part 6 of the Penal
 Code, and may not carry a loaded or concealed firearm unless the officer is exempted under the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 25450) of Chapter 2 of Division 5 of Title 4 of Part 6 of the Penal Code or Sections 25900 to 25910, inclusive, of the Penal Code or has met the requirements set forth in subdivision (d) of Section 26030 of the Penal Code. However, nothing herein shall exempt the retired peace officer who contracts for the officer’s services or the services of others as a private patrol operator.

(f) A peace officer in official police uniform acting in accordance with subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 70 of the Penal Code.

(g) An unarmed, uniformed security person employed exclusively and regularly by a motion picture studio facility employer who does not provide contract security services for other entities or persons in connection with the affairs of
 that employer only and where there exists an employer-employee relationship if that person at no time carries or uses a deadly weapon, as defined in subdivision (a), in the performance of that person’s duties, which may include, but are not limited to, the following business purposes:

(1) The screening and monitoring access of employees of the same employer.

(2) The screening and monitoring access of prearranged and preauthorized invited guests.

(3) The screening and monitoring of vendors and suppliers.

(4) Patrolling the private property facilities for the safety and welfare of all who have been legitimately authorized to have access to the facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 32.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7582.3.

(a) Unless specifically exempted by Section 7582.2, no person shall engage in the business of private patrol operator, as defined in Section 7582.1, unless that person has applied for and received a license to engage in that business pursuant to this chapter.

(b) Any person who violates any provision of this chapter or who conspires with another person to violate any provision of this chapter relating to private patrol operator licensure, or who knowingly engages a nonexempt unlicensed person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of five thousand dollars ($5,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(c) A proceeding to impose the fine specified in subdivision (b) may be brought in any court of competent jurisdiction in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General or by any district attorney or city attorney, or with the consent of the district attorney, the city prosecutor in any city or city and county having a full-time city prosecutor for the jurisdiction in which the violation occurred. If the action is brought by the district attorney, the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment is entered. If the action is brought by a city attorney or city prosecutor, one-half of the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the city in which the judgment was entered and one-half to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered. If the action is brought by the Attorney General, all of the penalty collected shall be deposited in the Private Security Services Fund.

(d) Any person who: (1) acts as or represents himself or herself to be a private patrol operator under this chapter when that person is not a licensee under this chapter; (2) falsely represents that he or she is employed by a licensee under this chapter when that person is not employed by a licensee under this chapter; (3) carries a badge, identification card, or business card, indicating that he or she is a licensee under this chapter when that person is not a licensee under this chapter; (4) uses a letterhead or other written or electronically generated materials indicating that he or she is a licensee under this chapter when that person is not a licensee under this chapter; or (5) advertises that he or she is a licensee under this chapter when that person is not a licensee, is guilty of a misdemeanor that is punishable by a fine of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(e) A proceeding to impose the fine specified in subdivision (d) may be brought in any court of competent jurisdiction in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General or by any district attorney or city attorney, or with the consent of the district attorney, the city prosecutor in any city or city and county having a full-time city prosecutor for the jurisdiction in which the violation occurred. If the action is brought by the district attorney, the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment is entered. If the action is brought by a city attorney or city prosecutor, one-half of the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the city in which the judgment was entered and one-half to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered. If the action is brought by the Attorney General, all of the penalty collected shall be deposited in the Private Security Services Fund.

(f) Any person who is convicted of a violation of the provisions of this section shall not be issued a license under this chapter, within one year following that conviction.

(g) Any person who is convicted of a violation of subdivision (a), (b), or (d) shall not be issued a license for a period of one year following a first conviction and shall not be issued a license for a period of five years following a second or subsequent conviction of subdivision (a), (b), or (d), or any combination of subdivision (a), (b), or (d).

(h) The chief shall gather evidence of violations of this chapter and of any rule or regulation established pursuant to this chapter by persons engaged in the business of private patrol operator who fail to obtain licenses and shall gather evidence of violations and furnish that evidence to prosecuting officers of any county or city for the purpose of prosecuting all violations occurring within their jurisdiction.

(i) The prosecuting officer of any county or city shall prosecute all violations of this chapter occurring within his or her jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 710, Sec. 4.5.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

7582.4.

(a) The superior court in and for the county in which any person has engaged or is about to engage in any act which constitutes a violation of Section 7582.3 may, upon a petition filed by the bureau with the approval of the director, issue an injunction or other appropriate order restraining this conduct and may impose a civil fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000). The proceedings under this section shall be governed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that there shall be no requirement to allege facts necessary to show or tending to show lack of adequate remedy at law or irreparable injury.

(b) The superior court for the county in which any person has engaged in any act which constitutes a violation of Section 7582.3 may, upon a petition filed by the bureau with the approval of the director, order this person to make restitution to persons injured as a result of the violation.

(c) The court may order a person subject to an injunction or restraining order, provided for in subdivision (a), or subject to an order requiring restitution pursuant to subdivision (b), to reimburse the bureau for expenses incurred by the bureau in its investigation related to its petition.

(d) A proceeding to impose the fine specified in subdivision (a) or to enjoin the unlicensed operation may be brought in any court of competent jurisdiction in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General, or by any district attorney or city attorney, or, with the consent of the district attorney, the city prosecutor in any city or city and county having a full-time city prosecutor, for the jurisdiction in which the violation occurred. If the action is brought by the district attorney, the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment is entered. If the action is brought by a city attorney or city prosecutor, one-half of the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the city in which the judgment was entered and one-half to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered. If the action is brought by the Attorney General, all of the penalty collected shall be deposited in the Private Security Services Fund.

(e) The remedy provided for by this section shall be in addition to any other remedy provided for in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 710, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

7582.5.

(a) The provisions of this chapter shall not prevent the local authorities of any city, county, or city and county, by ordinance and within the exercise of the police power of the city, county, or city and county from imposing local regulations upon any street patrol service or street patrol special officers requiring registration with an agency to be designated by the city, county, or city and county, including in the registration full information as to the identification and employment and subject to the right of the city, county, or city and county to allocate certain portions of the territory in the city, county, or city and county within which the activities of any street patrol service or person shall be confined. Any city, county, or city and county may refuse registration to any person of bad moral character and may impose reasonable additional requirements as are necessary to meet local needs and are not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.

(b) The provisions of this chapter shall not prevent the local authorities of any city, county, or city and county, by ordinance and within the exercise of the police power of the city, county, or city and county from imposing local regulations upon any employees of a private patrol operator who are unable to furnish evidence of current registration pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 7581.

(c) The provisions of this chapter shall not prevent the local authorities of any city, county, or city and county, by ordinance and within the exercise of the police power of the city, county, or city and county from requiring private patrol operators and their employees to register their name and file a copy of their state identification card with the city, county, or city and county. No fee may be charged and no application may be required by the city, county, or city and county for this registration.

(d) The provisions of this chapter shall not prevent the local authorities in any city, county, or city and county, by ordinance and within the exercise of the police power of the city, county, or city and county from imposing reasonable additional requirements necessary to regulate and control protection dogs according to their local needs and not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7582.6.

An application for a license under this chapter shall be on a form prescribed by the director and accompanied by the application fee provided by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7582.7.

An application shall be verified and shall include:

(a) The full name and business address of the applicant.

(b) The name under which the applicant intends to do business.

(c) A statement as to the general nature of the business in which the applicant intends to engage.

(d) A statement as to the type of license for which the applicant is applying.

(e) A verified statement of the applicant’s experience qualifications.

(f) (1) If the applicant is an individual, a qualified manager, partner of a partnership, or officer of a corporation designated in subdivision (i), one personal identification form provided by the bureau upon which shall appear a photograph taken within one year immediately preceding the date of the filing of the application together with two legible sets of fingerprints, one set of which shall be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for purposes of a background check, on a form approved by the Department of Justice, and a personal description of each person, respectively. The identification form shall include residence addresses and employment history for the previous five years and be signed under penalty of perjury.

(2) The bureau may impose a fee not to exceed three dollars ($3) for processing classifiable fingerprint cards submitted by applicants, excluding those submitted into an electronic
 fingerprint system using electronic fingerprint technology.

(g) In addition, if the applicant for a license is an individual, the application shall list all other names known as or used during the past 10 years and shall state that the applicant is to be personally and actively in charge of the business for which the license is sought, or if any other qualified manager is to be actively in charge of the business, the application shall be subscribed, verified, and signed by the applicant, under penalty of perjury, and if any other person is to be actively in charge of the business, the application shall also be subscribed, verified, and signed by that person under penalty of perjury.

(h) If the applicants for license are copartners, the application shall state the true names and addresses of all partners and the name of the partner to be actively in charge of the business for which
 the license is sought; and list all other names known as or used during the past 10 years, or if a qualified manager other than a partner is to be actively in charge of the business, then the application shall be subscribed, verified, and signed by all of the partners under penalty of perjury, and if any other person is to be actively in charge of the business, the application shall also be subscribed, verified, and signed by that person, under penalty of perjury, under penalty of perjury by all of the partners and qualified manager, or by all of the partners or the qualified manager.

(i) If the applicant for license is a corporation, the application shall state the true names, and complete residence addresses of the chief executive officer, secretary, chief financial officer, and any other corporate officer who will be active in the business to be licensed. The application shall also state the name and address of the designated person to be
 actively in charge of the business for which the license is sought. The application shall be subscribed, verified, and signed by a duly authorized officer of the applicant and by the qualified manager thereof, under penalty of perjury.

(j) If the applicant for a license is a participating tribe, the application shall state the names and business addresses of those individuals authorized to submit the application on behalf of the participating tribe, as well as the names and addresses of the designated persons to be actively in charge of the business for which the license is sought. The application shall be subscribed, verified, and signed by an officer of the participating tribe and by the qualified manager thereof, under penalty of perjury. 

(k) Any other information, evidence, statements, or documents as may be required by the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 33.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7582.8.

Before an application for a license or registration is granted, the applicant for a license or his or her manager or the applicant for a security guard registration shall meet all of the following:

(a) Be at least 18 years of age.

(b) Not have committed acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of a license under Section 480.

(c) Comply with the requirements specified in this chapter for the particular license or registration for which an application is made.

(d) Comply with other qualifications as the director may fix by rule.

(e) In lieu of meeting any other training-related requirements of this section, an applicant may apply for licensure or registration if he or she has completed comparable military training as documented by submission of Verification of Military Experience and Training (V-MET) records.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 405, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

7582.9.

The director may require an applicant or his or her manager, to demonstrate his or her qualifications by a written or oral examination, or a combination of both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7582.10.

Payment of the application fee prescribed by this chapter entitles an applicant or his or her manager to one examination without further charge. If the person fails to pass the examination, he or she shall not be eligible for any subsequent examination except upon payment of the reexamination fee prescribed by this chapter for each subsequent examination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7582.11.

(a) The chief shall issue a license, the form and content of which shall be determined by the chief in accordance with Section 164. In addition, the chief shall issue a “Certificate of Licensure” to any licensee, upon request and upon the payment of the fee prescribed in this chapter.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2018.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 32) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 429, Sec. 33.   (SB 547)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative July 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7582.12.

(a) The license shall at all times be posted in a conspicuous place in the principal place of business of the licensee.

(b) The director may assess a fine of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per violation of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 607, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

7582.13.

Upon the issuance of a license, a pocket card of the size, design, and content determined by the director shall be issued to each licensee, if an individual, or if the licensee is a person other than an individual, to its manager and to each of its officers and partners. The pocket card is evidence that the licensee is licensed pursuant to this chapter. The card shall contain the signature of the licensee, signature of the chief, and a photograph of the licensee, or bearer of the card, if the licensee is other than an individual. The card shall clearly state that the person is licensed as a private patrol operator or is the manager or officer of the licensee. The applicant may request to be issued an enhanced pocket card that shall be composed of a durable material and may incorporate technologically advanced security features. The bureau may charge a fee sufficient to reimburse the department’s costs for furnishing the enhanced pocket card. The fee charged may not exceed the actual costs for system development, maintenance, and processing necessary to provide this service, and may not exceed six dollars ($6). If the applicant does not request an enhanced card, the department shall issue a standard card at no cost. When a person to whom a card is issued terminates his or her position, office, or association with the licensee, the card shall be surrendered to the licensee and within five days thereafter shall be mailed or delivered by the licensee to the bureau for cancellation. Every person, while engaged in any activity for which registration is required, shall display their valid pocket card as provided by regulation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 401, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

7582.14.

A license issued under this chapter is not assignable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7582.15.

A licensee shall at all times be legally responsible for the good conduct in the business of each of his or her employees or agents, including his or her manager.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7582.16.

Each licensee shall maintain a record containing information relative to his or her employees as may be prescribed by the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7582.17.

(a) No licensee shall conduct a business under a fictitious or other business name unless and until he or she has obtained the written authorization of the bureau to do so.

(b) The bureau shall not authorize the use of a fictitious or other business name which is so similar to that of a public officer or agency or of that used by another licensee that the public may be confused or misled thereby.

(c) The authorization shall require, as a condition precedent to the use of any fictitious name, that the licensee comply with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17900) of Part 3 of Division 7.

(d) A licensee desiring to conduct his or her business under more than one fictitious business name shall obtain the authorization of the bureau in the manner prescribed in this section for the use of each name.

(e) The licensee shall pay a fee of at least seventy-five dollars ($75) that may be increased to an amount not to exceed eighty-two dollars ($82) for each authorization to use an additional fictitious business name and for each change in the use of a fictitious business name. If the original license is issued in a nonfictitious name and authorization is requested to have the license reissued in a fictitious business name, the licensee shall pay a fee of at least seventy-five dollars ($75) that may be increased to an amount not to exceed eighty-two dollars ($82) for the
 authorization.

(f) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2018.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 34) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 429, Sec. 35.   (SB 547)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative July 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7582.18.

Each licensee shall file with the bureau the complete address of his or her principal place of business including the name and number of the street, or, if the street where the business is located is not numbered, the number of the post office box. The director may require the filing of other information for the purpose of identifying the principal place of business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7582.19.

(a) A licensee shall notify the bureau within 30 days of any change in its corporate officers or of any addition of a new partner.

(b) Applications, on forms prescribed by the director, shall be submitted by all new officers and partners. The director may suspend or revoke a license issued under this chapter if the director determines that the new officer or partner of a licensee has committed any of the acts constituting grounds to deny an application for a license or to take disciplinary action against a licensee pursuant to Section 7582.24 or 7582.25 respectively.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 568, Sec. 94.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

7582.20.

(a) Every advertisement by a licensee soliciting or advertising business shall contain his or her name, address, and license number as they appear in the records of the bureau. For the purpose of this section, “advertisement” includes any business card, stationery, brochure, flyer, circular, newsletter, fax form, printed or published paid advertisement in any media form, or telephone book listing. Every advertisement by a licensee soliciting or advertising the licensee’s business shall contain his or her business name, business address or business telephone number, and license number, as they appear in the records of the bureau.

(b) The director may assess a fine of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per violation of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7582.21.

(a) A licensee shall not advertise or conduct business from any location other than that shown on the records of the bureau as their principal place of business unless they have received a branch office certificate for the location after compliance with the provisions of this chapter and any additional requirements necessary for the protection of the public as the director may by regulation prescribe. A licensee shall notify the bureau in writing within 10 days after closing or changing the location of a branch office.

(b) The director may assess a fine of five hundred dollars ($500) for the first violation of subdivision (a) and one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation thereafter.

(c) The branch office certificate shall be posted below the private patrol operator’s license. The qualified manager certificate shall be posted below the branch office certificate.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 25) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 571, Sec. 2.   (AB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7582.22.

(a) The business of each licensee shall be operated under the active direction, control, charge, or management, in this state, of the licensee, if they are qualified, or the person who is qualified to act as the licensee’s manager, if the licensee is not qualified. Any licensee conducting business in this state whose primary office is located outside of this state shall do both of the following:

(1) Maintain an office in this state operated under the active direction, control, charge, or management of a qualified manager.

(2) Maintain at the office in this state all records required under this chapter and under rules adopted by the bureau.

(b) No person shall act as a qualified manager of a licensee until they have complied with both of the following:

(1) Demonstrated their qualifications by a written or oral examination, or a combination of both, if required by the director.

(2) Made a satisfactory showing to the director that they have the qualifications prescribed in Section 7582.8 and that none of the facts stated in Section 7582.24 or 7582.25 exist as to them.

(c) The director shall issue a qualified manager certificate to any person meeting the requirements of this section. The certificate of the qualified manager shall be prominently displayed below the branch office license at the principal place of business. If the principal place of business is outside of this state, then the
 certificate of the qualified manager shall be posted below the branch office certificate at each branch office.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 27) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 571, Sec. 2.   (AB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7582.23.

(a) In case of the death of a person licensed as an individual, a member of the immediate family of the deceased licensee shall be entitled to continue the business under the same license for 120 days following the death of the licensee, provided that written application for permission is made to the bureau within 30 days following the death of the licensee. At the end of the 120-day period, the license shall be automatically canceled. If no request is received within the 30-day period, the license shall be automatically canceled at the end of that period.

(b) If the manager, who has qualified as provided in Section 7582.22, ceases for any reason whatsoever to be connected with the licensee to whom the license is issued, the licensee shall notify the bureau in writing 30 days from this cessation. If the notice of cessation is filed timely, the license shall remain in force for a period of 90 days after cessation or for an additional period, not to exceed one year, as approved by the director, pending the qualification of another manager as provided in this chapter. After the 90-day period or additional period, as approved by the director, the license shall be automatically suspended, unless the bureau receives written notification that the license is under the active charge of a qualified manager. If the licensee fails to notify the bureau within the 30-day period, his or her license shall be automatically suspended and may be reinstated only upon the filing of an application for reinstatement, payment of the reinstatement fee, and the qualification of a manager as provided in this chapter.

(c) In the case of the death or disassociation of a partner of an entity licensed as a partnership, the licensee shall notify the bureau, in writing, within 30 days from the death or disassociation of the individual. If notice is given, the license shall remain in force for 90 days following the death or disassociation. At the end of this period the license shall be automatically canceled. If the licensee fails to notify the bureau within the 30-day period, the license shall be automatically canceled.

(d) A license extended under this section is subject to all other provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7582.24.

After a hearing the director may deny a license unless the applicant makes a showing satisfactory to the director that the applicant, if an individual, has not, or if the applicant is a person other than an individual, that its manager and each of its officers have not:

(a) Committed any act, which, if committed by a licensee, would be a ground for the suspension or revocation of a license under this chapter.

(b) Committed any act constituting dishonesty or fraud.

(c) Committed any act or crime constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Section 480, including illegally using, carrying, or possessing a deadly weapon.

(d) Been refused a license under this chapter or had a license revoked.

(e) Been an officer, partner, or manager of any person who has been refused a license under this chapter or whose license has been revoked.

(f) While unlicensed committed, or aided and abetted the commission of, any act for which a license is required by this chapter.

(g) Knowingly made any false statement in his or her application.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7582.25.

The director may refuse to issue any license provided for in this chapter to any person:

(a) Who has had any license revoked, or whose license is under suspension, or has failed to renew his or her license while it was under suspension.

(b) If any member of any partnership, or any officer or director of any corporation, or any officer or person acting in a managerial capacity of any firm or association has had any license issued to him or her revoked, or whose license is under suspension, or who has failed to renew his or her license while it was under suspension.

(c) If any member of the partnership, or any officer or director of the corporation, or any officer or person acting in a managerial capacity of the firm or association, was either a member of any partnership, or an officer or director of any corporation, or an officer or person acting in a managerial capacity of any firm or association, whose license has been revoked, or whose license is under suspension, or who failed to renew a license while it was under suspension, and while acting as such member, officer, director, or person acting in a managerial capacity participated in any of the prohibited acts for which any such license was revoked or suspended.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7582.26.

(a) Any licensee or officer, director, partner, or manager of a licensee may divulge to any law enforcement officer or district attorney, or his or her representative, any information he or she may acquire as to any criminal offense, but he or she shall not divulge to any other person, except as he or she may be required by law so to do, any information acquired by him or her except at the direction of the employer or client for whom the information was obtained.

(b) No licensee or officer, director, partner, manager, or employee of a licensee shall knowingly make any false report to his or her employer or client for whom information was being obtained.

(c) No written report shall be submitted to a client except by the licensee, qualifying manager, or a person authorized by one or either of them, and the person submitting the report shall exercise diligence in ascertaining whether or not the facts and information in the report are true and correct.

(d) No licensee, or officer, director, partner, manager, or employee of a licensee, shall use a title, or wear a uniform, or use an insignia, or use an identification card, or make any statement with the intent to give an impression that he or she is connected in any way with the federal government, a state government, or any political subdivision of a state government.

(e) No licensee, or officer, director, partner, manager, or employee of a licensee, shall enter any private building or portion thereof, except premises commonly accessible to the public, without the consent of the owner or of the person in legal possession thereof.

(f) No private patrol licensee or officer, director, partner, manager, or employee of a private patrol licensee shall use or wear a badge, except while engaged in guard or patrol work and while wearing a distinctive uniform. A private patrol licensee or officer, director, partner, manager, or employee of a private patrol licensee wearing a distinctive uniform shall wear a patch on each shoulder of his or her uniform that reads “private security” and that includes the name of the private patrol company by which the person is employed or for which the person is a representative and a badge or cloth patch on the upper left breast of the uniform. All patches and badges worn on a distinctive uniform shall be of a standard design approved by the director and shall be clearly visible.

The director may assess a fine of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per violation of this subdivision.

(g) No licensee shall permit an employee or agent in his or her own name to advertise, engage clients, furnish reports or present bills to clients, or in any manner whatever conduct business for which a license is required under this chapter. All business of the licensee shall be conducted in the name of and under the control of the licensee.

(h) No licensee shall use a fictitious name in connection with the official activities of the licensee’s business.

(i) No private patrol operator licensee or officer, director, partner, or manager of a private patrol operator licensee, or person required to be registered as a security guard pursuant to this chapter shall use or wear a baton or exposed firearm as authorized by this chapter unless he or she is wearing a uniform which complies with the requirements of Section 7582.27.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 607, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

7582.27.

(a) Any person referred to in subdivision (i) of Section 7582.26 who uses or wears a baton or exposed firearm as authorized pursuant to this chapter shall wear a patch on each arm that reads “private security” and that includes the name of the company by which the person is employed or for which the person is a representative. The patch shall be clearly visible at all times. The patches of a private patrol operator licensee, or his or her employees or representatives shall be of a standard design approved by the director.

(b) The director may assess a fine of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per violation of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 607, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

7582.28.

(a) Any badge or cap insignia worn by a person who is a licensee, officer, director, partner, manager, or employee of a licensee shall be of a design approved by the director, and shall bear on its face a distinctive word indicating the name of the licensee and an employee number by which the person may be identified by the licensee.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed to authorize persons to wear badges who are prohibited by Section 7582.26 from wearing badges.

(b) The director may assess a fine of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per violation of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 607, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Private Patrol Operators [7583. - 7583.47.]

7583.

For purposes of this article, “licensee” means a licensed private patrol operator.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1285, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7583.1.
